src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-msc-ben_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # ȟaaben o-stem
    ȟaaben+N+Msc+Sg+Nom: ȟaaben
    ȟaaben+N+Msc+Sg+Obl: ȟaabenes
    ȟaaben+N+Msc+Sg+Dat: ȟaabeneske
    ȟaaben+N+Msc+Sg+Abl: ȟaabenesta
    ȟaaben+N+Msc+Sg+Ins: ȟaabeneha
    ȟaaben+N+Msc+Sg+Gen: ȟaabenesko
    ȟaaben+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Kiiro: [ȟaabeneskiiro, ȟaabeneskiiri, ȟaabeneskiire]
    ȟaaben+N+Msc+Pl+Nom: ȟaabene
    ȟaaben+N+Msc+Pl+Obl: ȟaabenen
    ȟaaben+N+Msc+Pl+Dat: ȟaabenenge
    ȟaaben+N+Msc+Pl+Abl: ȟaabenenna
    ȟaaben+N+Msc+Pl+Ins: ȟaabenensa
    ȟaaben+N+Msc+Pl+Gen: ȟaabenengo
    ȟaaben+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Kiiro: [ȟaabenengiiro, ȟaabenengiiri, ȟaabenengiire]
